Wisconsin, session 2025, SB233.
do enact as follows:SB233,11Section 1. 12.11 (1) of the statutes is renumbered 12.11 (1) (intro.) and 2amended to read:SB233,2,3312.11 (1) (intro.) In this section, “anything:SB233,2,84(a) “Anything of value” includes any amount of money, or any object which has 5utility independent of any political message it contains and the value of which 6exceeds $1, or $5 for purposes of sub. (1m) (a) 5. and 6. The prohibitions of this 7section apply to the distribution of material printed at public expense and available 8for free distribution if such materials are accompanied by a political message.SB233,29Section 2. 12.11 (1) (b) of the statutes is created to read:SB233,2,101012.11 (1) (b) “Election period” means any of the following:SB233,2,12111. The period beginning on December 1 and ending on the date of the spring 12election.SB233,2,14132. The period beginning on April 15 and ending on the date of the general 14election.SB233,2,16153. The period beginning on the first day for circulating nomination papers for 16a special election and ending on the date of the special election.SB233,2,18174. The period beginning on the first day for circulating nomination papers for 18a recall election and ending on the date of the recall election.SB233,319Section 3. 12.11 (1m) (a) 5. and 6. of the statutes are created to read:SB233,3,32012.11 (1m) (a) 5. Sign or refrain from signing a petition supporting or 1opposing a candidate, referendum, or proposition about political or social issues, 2state law, or proposed or potential legislation, if the petition relates to an election or 3referendum or is circulated during an election period.SB233,3,546. Sign or refrain from signing nomination papers or a petition for the recall of 5an elective official.SB233,46Section 4. 12.11 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:SB233,3,9712.11 (2) This section applies to any convention or meeting held for the 8purpose of nominating any candidate for any election, and to the signing of any 9nomination paper.SB233,3,1010